Illinois, session 104th, HB5135.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Adult Education Act is amended by changing 5Sections 2-4 and 3-1 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 405/2-4)  (from Ch. 122, par. 202-4)7    Sec. 2-4. Area Planning Councils. An Area Planning Council 8shall be established within the boundaries of each community 9college district. A representative of each approved adult 10education provider is required to participate on the Area 11Planning Council. Other members may include:12        (1) regional superintendents of schools;13        (2) representatives of school districts;14        (3) representatives of the community college 15    district's career and technical education program;16        (4) representatives of the community college 17    district's financial aid office;18        (5) representatives of the community college 19    district's student services office;20        (6) representatives of local workforce boards under 21    the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act;22        (7) persons with an interest in adult education 23    services provided within the community college district;   HB5135 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19770 LNS 33220 b1    and2        (8) persons with an interest in adult education 3    services provided within the Area Planning Council 4    district, including, but not limited to, representatives 5    of social service agencies, businesses and employers, 6    vocational rehabilitation services of the Department of 7    Human Services, and the Department of Employment Security.8Each Area Planning Council must elect officers and develop 9bylaws that indicate the membership of the Council. The Area 10Planning Council chairperson must be a representative of an 11adult education provider approved by the Board. In areas where 12large multiple-provider Area Planning Councils exist, the 13Board may designate sub-areas within an Area Planning Council 14district to ensure maximum representation of need. The Board 15shall determine the guidelines for the bylaws and operation of 16the Area Planning Council.17    On or before March 1 of each year each Area Planning 18Council shall submit an annual Adult Education Plan for the 19area. The Area Adult Education Plan shall provide for the 20development and coordination of adult education programs in 21the area as prescribed by the Board. The Area Adult Education 22Plan must be aligned with Title II of the federal Workforce 23Innovation and Opportunity Act, the State Unified Plan, local 24workforce boards, and one-stop activities and must include 25involvement of the local Board-approved adult education 26workforce board representative. The local adult education   HB5135 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19770 LNS 33220 b1workforce board representative is responsible for convening 2Area Planning Council chairpersons in a local workforce area 3to provide information regarding the development of the Area 4Adult Education Plans and related federal Workforce Innovation 5and Opportunity Act activities. If the Board finds that the 6annual Area Adult Education Plan submitted by the Area 7Planning Council meets the requirements of this amendatory Act 8of 1982 and the established standards and guidelines, the 9Board shall approve the Plan. The approval of adult education 10programs by the Board for reimbursement under Section 2-12.5 11of the Public Community College Act shall be based on the Adult 12Education Plan approved for the Area. The Area Adult Education 13Plan must be approved prior to funding being made available to 14an Area Planning Council district.15    On or before March 1, 2002 and each year thereafter, the 16Board shall submit an annual report to the Governor and the 17General Assembly for adult education for the preceding school 18year. The annual report shall include a summary of adult 19education needs and programs; the number of students served, 20federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act activities, 21high school equivalency information, credit hours or units of 22instruction, performance data, and total adult education 23allocations, and State reimbursement for adult basic 24education, adult secondary education, English language 25acquisition, high school credit, integrated English literacy 26and civics education, and bridge and integrated education and   HB5135 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 19770 LNS 33220 b1training programs in coordination with vocational skills 2training; the criteria used for program approval; and any 3recommendations.4(Source: P.A. 101-289, eff. 8-9-19.) 5    (105 ILCS 405/3-1)  (from Ch. 122, par. 203-1)6    Sec. 3-1. Apportionment for adult education courses. Any 7school district maintaining adult education classes for the 8instruction of persons over 21 years of age and youths under 21 9years of age whose schooling has been interrupted shall be 10entitled to claim an apportionment in accordance with the 11provisions of Section 10-22.20 of the School Code and Section 122-4 of this Act. Any public community college district 13maintaining adult education classes for the instruction of 14those persons who (i) are 17 16 years of age or older, are not 15enrolled or required to be enrolled in a secondary school 16under State law, and are basic-skills deficient, (ii) do not 17have a secondary school diploma or its recognized equivalent 18and have not achieved an equivalent level of education, or 19(iii) are an English language learner shall be entitled to 20claim an apportionment in accordance with the provisions of 21Section 2-16.02 of the Public Community College Act.22    Reimbursement as herein provided shall be limited to adult 23basic education, adult secondary and high school equivalency 24testing education, high school credit, literacy, including 25digital literacy, English language acquisition, integrated   HB5135 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 19770 LNS 33220 b1English literacy and civics education, integrated education 2and training in coordination with vocational skills training, 3and any other activities that are approved by the Board.4    If the amount appropriated for this purpose is less than 5the amount required under the provisions of this Section, the 6apportionment for local districts shall be proportionately 7reduced.8(Source: P.A. 101-289, eff. 8-9-19.) 9    Section 10. The Public Community College Act is amended by 10changing Sections 2-12 and 2-12.5 as follows: 11    (110 ILCS 805/2-12)  (from Ch. 122, par. 102-12)12    Sec. 2-12. The State Board shall have the power and it 13shall be its duty: 14        (a) To provide statewide planning for community 15    colleges as institutions of higher education and to 16    coordinate the programs, services and activities of all 17    community colleges in the State so as to encourage and 18    establish a system of locally initiated and administered 19    comprehensive community colleges.20        (b) To organize and conduct feasibility surveys for 21    new community colleges or for the inclusion of existing 22    institutions as community colleges and the locating of new 23    institutions.24        (c) (Blank).  HB5135 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 19770 LNS 33220 b1        (c-5) In collaboration with the community colleges, to 2    furnish information for State and federal accountability 3    purposes, promote student and institutional improvement, 4    and meet research needs.5        (d) To cooperate with the community colleges in 6    collecting and maintaining student characteristics, 7    enrollment and completion data, faculty and staff 8    characteristics, financial data, admission standards, 9    facility data, and any other issues facing community 10    colleges.11        (e) To enter into contracts with other governmental 12    agencies and eligible providers, such as local educational 13    agencies, community-based organizations of demonstrated 14    effectiveness, volunteer literacy organizations of 15    demonstrated effectiveness, institutions of higher 16    education, public and private nonprofit agencies, 17    libraries, and public housing authorities; to accept 18    federal funds and to plan with other State agencies when 19    appropriate for the allocation of such federal funds for 20    instructional programs and student services including such 21    funds for adult education and literacy, vocational and 22    career and technical education, and retraining as may be 23    allocated by state and federal agencies for the aid of 24    community colleges. To receive, receipt for, hold in 25    trust, expend and administer, for all purposes of this 26    Act, funds and other aid made available by the federal   HB5135 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 19770 LNS 33220 b1    government or by other agencies public or private, subject 2    to appropriation by the General Assembly. The changes to 3    this subdivision (e) made by Public Act 91-830 apply on 4    and after July 1, 2001.5        (f) To determine efficient and adequate standards for 6    community colleges for the physical plant, heating, 7    lighting, ventilation, sanitation, safety, equipment and 8    supplies, instruction and teaching, curriculum, library, 9    operation, maintenance, and administration and 10    supervision.11        (g) To determine the standards for establishment of 12    community colleges and the proper location of the site in 13    relation to existing institutions of higher education 14    offering academic, occupational and technical training 15    curricula, possible enrollment, assessed valuation, 16    industrial, business, agricultural, and other conditions 17    reflecting educational needs in the area to be served; 18    however, no community college may be considered as being 19    recognized nor may the establishment of any community 20    college be authorized in any district which shall be 21    deemed inadequate for the maintenance, in accordance with 22    the desirable standards thus determined, of a community 23    college offering the basic subjects of general education 24    and suitable vocational and semiprofessional and technical 25    curricula.26        (h) To approve or disapprove new units of instruction,   HB5135 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 19770 LNS 33220 b1    research or public service as defined in Section 3-25.1 of 2    this Act submitted by the boards of trustees of the 3    respective community college districts of this State. The 4    State Board may discontinue programs which fail to reflect 5    the educational needs of the area being served. The 6    community college district shall be granted 60 days 7    following the State Board staff recommendation and prior 8    to the State Board's action to respond to concerns 9    regarding the program in question. If the State Board acts 10    to abolish a community college program, the community 11    college district has a right to appeal the decision in 12    accordance with administrative rules promulgated by the 13    State Board under the provisions of the Illinois 14    Administrative Procedure Act.15        (i) To review and approve or disapprove any contract 16    or agreement that community colleges enter into with any 17    organization, association, educational institution, or 18    government agency to provide educational services for 19    academic credit. The State Board is authorized to monitor 20    performance under any contract or agreement that is 21    approved by the State Board. If the State Board does not 22    approve a particular contract or agreement, the community 23    college district has a right to appeal the decision in 24    accordance with administrative rules promulgated by the 25    State Board under the provisions of the Illinois 26    Administrative Procedure Act. Nothing in this subdivision   HB5135 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 19770 LNS 33220 b1    (i) shall be interpreted as applying to collective 2    bargaining agreements with any labor organization.3        (j) To establish guidelines regarding sabbatical 4    leaves.5        (k) (Blank).6        (l) (Blank).7        (m) (Blank).8        (n) To create and participate in the conduct and 9    operation of any corporation, joint venture, partnership, 10    association, or other organizational entity that has the 11    power: (i) to acquire land, buildings, and other capital 12    equipment for the use and benefit of the community 13    colleges or their students; (ii) to accept gifts and make 14    grants for the use and benefit of the community colleges 15    or their students; (iii) to aid in the instruction and 16    education of students of community colleges; and (iv) to 17    promote activities to acquaint members of the community 18    with the facilities of the various community colleges.19        (o) To ensure the effective teaching of adult learners 20    and to prepare them for success in employment and lifelong 21    learning by administering a network of providers, 22    programs, and services to provide classes for the 23    instruction of those individuals who (i) are 17 16 years 24    of age or older, are not enrolled or required to be 25    enrolled in a secondary school under State law, and are 26    basic-skills deficient, (ii) do not have a secondary   HB5135 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 19770 LNS 33220 b1    school diploma or its recognized equivalent and have not 2    achieved an equivalent level of education, or (iii) are an 3    English language learner. Classes in adult education may 4    include adult basic education, adult secondary and high 5    school equivalency testing education, high school credit, 6    literacy, including digital literacy, English language 7    acquisition, integrated education and training in 8    coordination with vocational skills training, and any 9    other instruction designed to prepare adult students to 10    function successfully in society and to experience success 11    in postsecondary education and employment. 12        (p) To supervise the administration of adult education 13    and literacy programs, to establish the standards for such 14    courses of instruction and supervise the administration 15    thereof, to contract with other State and local agencies 16    and eligible providers of demonstrated effectiveness, such 17    as local educational agencies, community-based 18    organizations, volunteer literacy organizations, 19    institutions of higher education, public and private 20    nonprofit agencies, libraries, public housing authorities, 21    and nonprofit institutions for the purpose of promoting 22    and establishing classes for instruction under these 23    programs, to contract with other State and local agencies 24    to accept and expend appropriations for educational 25    purposes to fund reimburse local eligible providers for 26    the cost of these programs, and to establish an advisory   HB5135 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 19770 LNS 33220 b1    council consisting of all categories of eligible 2    providers; agency partners, such as the State Board of 3    Education, the Department of Human Services, the 4    Department of Employment Security, the Department of 5    Commerce and Economic Opportunity, and the Secretary of 6    State literacy program; and other stakeholders to 7    identify, deliberate, and make recommendations to the 8    State Board on adult education policy and priorities. The 9    State Board shall support statewide geographic 10    distribution; diversity of eligible providers; and the 11    adequacy, stability, and predictability of funding so as 12    not to disrupt or diminish, but rather to enhance, adult 13    education and literacy services.14(Source: P.A. 103-940, eff. 8-9-24.) 15    (110 ILCS 805/2-12.5)16    Sec. 2-12.5. Classes for adults and youths, 17 and older, 17who are not currently enrolled in secondary school whose 18schooling has been interrupted.19    (a) The State Board shall distribute funds to reimburse 20adult education providers from funds appropriated for approved 21expenses that are established and determined by the State 22Board in compliance with the federal Workforce Innovation and 23Opportunity Act and other State and federal requirements. The 24State Board shall establish standards to determine the cost of 25instruction, including any other authorized incidental costs,   HB5135 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 19770 LNS 33220 b1which shall serve as the basis of State reimbursement in 2accordance with the provisions of this Section. In the 3approval of programs and the determination of the cost of 4instruction, the State Board shall provide for the maximum 5utilization of federal and State funds for those programs. The 6State Board shall also provide for:7        (1) the method for allocating federal and State funds, 8    including the development of an index of need for program 9    planning and for area funding allocations, as defined by 10    the State Board;11        (2) the method for calculating hours of instruction, 12    as defined by the State Board, claimable for reimbursement 13    and a method to phase in the calculation and for adjusting 14    the calculations in cases in which the services of a 15    program are interrupted due to circumstances beyond the 16    control of the program provider;17        (3) a plan for the reallocation of funds to increase 18    the amount allocated for grants based upon program 19    performance; and20        (4) the development of standards, programs, and 21    guidelines consistent with the federal and State law 22    Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.23    (b) (Blank). For adult education instruction as listed 24under subdivision (o) of Section 2-12, the maximum generation 25rate for reimbursement per credit hour or per unit of 26instruction shall be equal to the community college system   HB5135 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 19770 LNS 33220 b1reimbursement rate for adult education divided by one-third.2    (c) Upon its annual approval, the State Board shall 3provide grants to eligible programs for activities to improve 4or expand services under the federal and State law Workforce 5Innovation and Opportunity Act, Title II - Adult Education and 6Literacy. Eligible programs shall be determined based upon 7competitive processes and based on federal and State program 8considerations, as set by the State Board.9    (c-5) State adult education funds, except for funds 10specifically provided as a match as required by federal law, 11are not subject to the authorizing federal law. 12    (d) Reimbursement under this Section may not exceed the 13actual costs of the approved program. Approved programs may 14assess students, except those students receiving public aid 15under the Illinois Public Aid Code, up to $6.00 per credit hour 16or unit of instruction, not to exceed $30.00 per semester per 17student, if needed to meet program costs.18    (e) Each An education plan shall be established for each 19adult learner who is participating in the instructional 20programs provided under this Section shall complete an 21assessment of foundational skills to appropriately place the 22adult learner in an instructional program.23    (f) Each adult education provider shall keep an accurate 24and detailed account of the students assigned to and receiving 25instruction under this Section who are enrolled in classroom 26instruction. Each adult education provider shall submit   HB5135 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 19770 LNS 33220 b1periodic reports of services provided as required by the State 2Board.3    (g) For classes authorized under this Section, a credit 4hour or unit of instruction is equal to 15 hours of direct 5instruction for students enrolled in approved adult education 6programs at midterm and making satisfactory progress, in 7accordance with standards established by the State Board.8    (h) If an approved adult education provider fails to 9provide or is providing unsatisfactory or insufficient classes 10under Section 2-12 and this Section, the State Board may enter 11into agreements with other eligible providers.12(Source: P.A. 101-289, eff. 8-9-19.)